Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2742.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 9, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1469, to read: START_STATUTE41-1469. Unlawful employment practices; protective hairstyles; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, it is an unlawful employment practice for any employer, labor organization or joint labor-management committee controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs, including on-the-job training programs, to discriminate against any individual because of the individual's protective hairstyle, race or ethnicity. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Protective hairstyle" includes such hairstyles as braids, locks and twists of any length. 2. "Race or ethnicity" includes: (a) Ancestry, color, ethnic group identification and ethnic background. (b) Traits that are historically associated with race, including hair texture and protective hairstyles. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 9, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1492.13, to read: START_STATUTE41-1492.13. Protective hairstyles; discrimination by schools prohibited; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, it is unlawful for a nursery, elementary, secondary, undergraduate or postgraduate private school or other place of education to discriminate against any individual because of the individual's protective hairstyle, race or ethnicity. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Protective hairstyle" includes such hairstyles as braids, locks and twists of any length. 2. "Race or ethnicity" includes: (a) Ancestry, color, ethnic group identification and ethnic background. (b) Traits that are historically associated with race, including hair texture and protective hairstyles. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Short title This act may be cited as the "Creating a Respectful and Open World for Natural Hair (CROWN) Act".